Louisiana, session 2026, HB820.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:4(C)(17)(c) and 1107.3 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§4. Jurisdiction, duties, and powers of the secretary; rules and regulations
* * *
C. The secretary has authority to make, after notice and hearings as provided
in this Chapter, any reasonable rules, regulations, and orders that are necessary from
time to time in the proper administration and enforcement of this Chapter, including
rules, regulations, or orders for the following purposes:
* * *
(17)
* * *
(c) Pipelines authorized under this Paragraph for the transport of carbon
dioxide shall be subject to the provisions of R.S. 30:1107.3.
* * *
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-512 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 820
§1107.3. Manifests; carbon dioxide transport
A. All transporters of carbon dioxide shall be required to utilize a manifest
system for the orderly tracking of carbon dioxide from the generation site to the site
of use, storage, or disposal. The manifests shall, at a minimum, contain the
identification and location of the generator, each transporter, the end user and
destination site, and the volume of carbon dioxide transported. The secretary may
establish additional criteria for the manifest system to facilitate the monitoring of
carbon dioxide transported within the state.
B. If the owner or operator of a destination site of the carbon dioxide is a
different entity than that which transported the carbon dioxide, the owner or operator
at the destination site shall be provided a copy of the manifest.
C. The manifest shall be maintained for no less than ten years and shall be
available for inspection by the department upon request.
D.(1) Failure to create and maintain the manifest shall subject the transporter
or owner or operator of the destination site to the penalties provided in R.S. 30:1106.
(2) Should the manifest created pursuant to this Section indicate a different
end use or purpose for the carbon dioxide than any activities for which a certificate
of public convenience and necessity was issued by the secretary, the transporter and
owner or operator of the destination site shall be subject to penalties in R.S. 30:1106
up to and including revocation of any permits issued by the department.